test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-08kask_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kask: # Noun (8) kask 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kask+N+Sg+Nom: kask
     kask+N+Sg+Gen: kaska
     kask+N+Sg+Par: kaskat
     kask+N+Sg+Ill: kaskahe
     kask+N+Sg+Ine: kaskan
     kask+N+Sg+Ela: kaskast
     kask+N+Sg+All: kaskalõ
     kask+N+Sg+Ade: kaskal
     kask+N+Sg+Abl: kaskalt
     kask+N+Sg+Tra: kaskas
     kask+N+Sg+Ter: kaskaniq
     kask+N+Sg+Abe: kaskaldaq
     kask+N+Sg+Com: kaskagaq
     kask+N+Pl+Nom: kaskaq
     kask+N+Pl+Gen: kaskidõ
     kask+N+Pl+Par: kaskit
     kask+N+Pl+Ill: kaskihe
     kask+N+Pl+Ine: kaskin
     kask+N+Pl+Ela: kaskist
     kask+N+Pl+All: kaskilõ
     kask+N+Pl+Ade: kaskil
     kask+N+Pl+Abl: kaskilt
     kask+N+Pl+Tra: kaskis
     kask+N+Pl+Ter: kaskiniq
     kask+N+Pl+Abe: kaskildaq
     kask+N+Pl+Com: kaskidõgaq
